skt_gen/Sentence/UNKN_PDGM/unknwn_sup.dix
<pardef n="/U__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>UH</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>O</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>vaH</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Um</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>O</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Un</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>vA</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>UByAm</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>UBiH</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>


<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ve</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>UByAm</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>UByaH</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>vaH</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uByAm</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uByaH</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>vaH</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>vO</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>vAm</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>vi</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>vO</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>URu</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>


<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>UH</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>vO</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>vaH</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/q__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>A</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ArO</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AraH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Aram</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ArO</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Qn</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>


<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>rA</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qByAm</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qBiH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>re</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qByAm</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qByaH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qByAm</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qByaH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>roH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>QNAm</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ari</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>roH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qRu</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>aH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ArO</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>AraH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <e lm="" r="RL"><i></i><par n="/U__nm"/></e>
